Ohio, session 136, HB902.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 2151.011, 2151.411, 2151.412, 2151.416, 2151.417, 2151.4122, 2151.424, and 5103.161 be amended and new sections 2151.4115, 2151.4116, 2151.4117, 2151.4118, 2151.4119, and 2151.4120 and section 2151.317 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 2151.011. (A) As used in the Revised Code: (1) "Juvenile court" means whichever of the following is applicable that has jurisdiction under this chapter and Chapter 2152. of the Revised Code: (a) The division of the court of common pleas specified in section 2101.022 or 2301.03 of the Revised Code as having jurisdiction under this chapter and Chapter 2152. of the Revised Code or as being the juvenile division or the juvenile division combined with one or more other divisions; (b) The juvenile court of Cuyahoga county or Hamilton county that is separately and independently created by section 2151.08 or Chapter 2153. of the Revised Code and that has jurisdiction under this chapter and Chapter 2152. of the Revised Code; (c) If division (A)(1)(a) or (b) of this section does not apply, the probate division of the court of common pleas. (2) "Juvenile judge" means a judge of a court having jurisdiction under this chapter. (3) "Private child placing agency" means any association, as defined in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code, that is certified under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code to accept temporary, permanent, or legal custody of children and place the children for either foster care or adoption. (4) "Private noncustodial agency" means any person, organization, association, or society certified by the department of children and youth that does not accept temporary or permanent legal custody of children, that is privately operated in this state, and that does one or more of the following: (a) Receives and cares for children for two or more consecutive weeks; (b) Participates in the placement of children in certified foster homes; (c) Provides adoption services in conjunction with a public children services agency or private child placing agency. (B) As used in this chapter: (1) "Adequate parental care" means the provision by a child's parent or parents, guardian, or custodian of adequate food, clothing, and shelter to ensure the child's health and physical safety and the provision by a child's parent or parents of specialized services warranted by the child's physical or mental needs. (2) "Adult" means an individual who is eighteen years of age or older. (3) "Agreement for temporary custody" means a voluntary agreement authorized by section 5103.15 of the Revised Code that transfers the temporary custody of a child to a public children services agency or a private child placing agency. (4) "Alternative response" means the public children services agency's response to a report of child abuse or neglect that engages the family in a comprehensive evaluation of child safety, risk of subsequent harm, and family strengths and needs and that does not include a determination as to whether child abuse or neglect occurred. (5) "Certified foster home" means a foster home, as defined in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code, certified under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code. (6) "Child" means a person who is under eighteen years of age, except that the juvenile court has jurisdiction over any person who is adjudicated an unruly child prior to attaining eighteen years of age until the person attains twenty-one years of age, and, for purposes of that jurisdiction related to that adjudication, a person who is so adjudicated an unruly child shall be deemed a "child" until the person attains twenty-one years of age. (7) "Child day camp," "child care," "child care center," "part-time child care center," "type A family child care home," "licensed type B family child care home," "type B family child care home," "administrator of a child care center," "administrator of a type A family child care home," and "in-home aide" have the same meanings as in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code. (8) "Child care provider" means an individual who is a child-care staff member or administrator of a child care center, a type A family child care home, or a type B family child care home, or an in-home aide or an individual who is licensed, is regulated, is approved, operates under the direction of, or otherwise is certified by the department of children and youth, department of developmental disabilities, or the early childhood programs of the department of education. (9) "Commit" means to vest custody as ordered by the court. (10) "Counseling" includes both of the following: (a) General counseling services performed by a public children services agency or shelter for victims of domestic violence to assist a child, a child's parents, and a child's siblings in alleviating identified problems that may cause or have caused the child to be an abused, neglected, or dependent child. (b) Psychiatric or psychological therapeutic counseling services provided to correct or alleviate any mental or emotional illness or disorder and performed by a licensed psychiatrist, licensed psychologist, or a person licensed under Chapter 4757. of the Revised Code to engage in social work or professional counseling. (11) "Custodian" means a person who has legal custody of a child or a public children services agency or private child placing agency that has permanent, temporary, or legal custody of a child. (12) "Delinquent child" has the same meaning as in section 2152.02 of the Revised Code. (13) "Detention" means the temporary care of children pending court adjudication or disposition, or execution of a court order, in a public or private facility designed to physically restrict the movement and activities of children. (14) "Developmental disability" has the same meaning as in section 5123.01 of the Revised Code. (15) "Differential response approach" means an approach that a public children services agency may use to respond to accepted reports of child abuse or neglect with either an alternative response or a traditional response. (16) "Foster caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code. (17) "Guardian" means a person, association, or corporation that is granted authority by a probate court pursuant to Chapter 2111. of the Revised Code to exercise parental rights over a child to the extent provided in the court's order and subject to the residual parental rights of the child's parents. (18) "Habitual truant" means any child of compulsory school age who is absent without legitimate excuse for absence from the public school the child is supposed to attend for thirty or more consecutive hours, forty-two or more hours in one school month, or seventy-two or more hours in a school year. (19) "Intellectual disability" has the same meaning as in section 5123.01 of the Revised Code. (20) "Juvenile traffic offender" has the same meaning as in section 2152.02 of the Revised Code. (21) "Legal custody" means a legal status that vests in the custodian the right to have physical care and control of the child and to determine where and with whom the child shall live, and the right and duty to protect, train, and discipline the child and to provide the child with food, shelter, education, and medical care, all subject to any residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities. An individual granted legal custody shall exercise the rights and responsibilities personally unless otherwise authorized by any section of the Revised Code or by the court. (22) A "legitimate excuse for absence from the public school the child is supposed to attend" includes, but is not limited to, any of the following: (a) The fact that the child in question has enrolled in and is attending another public or nonpublic school in this or another state; (b) The fact that the child in question is excused from attendance at school for any of the reasons specified in section 3321.04 or 3321.042 of the Revised Code; (c) The fact that the child in question has received an age and schooling certificate in accordance with section 3331.01 of the Revised Code. (23) "Mental illness" has the same meaning as in section 5122.01 of the Revised Code. (24) "Mental injury" means any behavioral, cognitive, emotional, or mental disorder in a child caused by an act or omission that is described in section 2919.22 of the Revised Code and is committed by the parent or other person responsible for the child's care. (25) "Nonsecure care, supervision, or training" means care, supervision, or training of a child in a facility that does not confine or prevent movement of the child within the facility or from the facility. (26) "Of compulsory school age" has the same meaning as in section 3321.01 of the Revised Code. (27) "Organization" means any institution, public, semipublic, or private, and any private association, society, or agency located or operating in the state, incorporated or unincorporated, having among its functions the furnishing of protective services or care for children, or the placement of children in certified foster homes or elsewhere. (28) "Out-of-home care" means detention facilities, shelter facilities, certified children's crisis care facilities, certified foster homes, placement in a prospective adoptive home prior to the issuance of a final decree of adoption, organizations, certified organizations, child care centers, type A family child care homes, type B family child care homes, child care provided by in-home aides, group home providers, group homes, institutions, state institutions, residential facilities, residential care facilities, residential camps, day camps, private, nonprofit therapeutic wilderness camps, public schools, chartered nonpublic schools, educational service centers, hospitals, and medical clinics that are responsible for the care, physical custody, or control of children. (29) "Out-of-home care child abuse" means any of the following when committed by a person responsible for the care of a child in out-of-home care: (a) Engaging in sexual activity with a child in the person's care; (b) Denial to a child, as a means of punishment, of proper or necessary subsistence, education, medical care, or other care necessary for a child's health; (c) Use of restraint procedures on a child that cause injury or pain; (d) Administration of prescription drugs or psychotropic medication to the child without the written approval and ongoing supervision of a licensed physician; (e) Commission of any act, other than by accidental means, that results in any injury to or death of the child in out-of-home care or commission of any act by accidental means that results in an injury to or death of a child in out-of-home care and that is at variance with the history given of the injury or death. (30) "Out-of-home care child neglect" means any of the following when committed by a person responsible for the care of a child in out-of-home care: (a) Failure to provide reasonable supervision according to the standards of care appropriate to the age, mental and physical condition, or other special needs of the child; (b) Failure to provide reasonable supervision according to the standards of care appropriate to the age, mental and physical condition, or other special needs of the child, that results in sexual or physical abuse of the child by any person; (c) Failure to develop a process for all of the following: (i) Administration of prescription drugs or psychotropic drugs for the child; (ii) Assuring that the instructions of the licensed physician who prescribed a drug for the child are followed; (iii) Reporting to the licensed physician who prescribed the drug all unfavorable or dangerous side effects from the use of the drug. (d) Failure to provide proper or necessary subsistence, education, medical care, or other individualized care necessary for the health or well-being of the child; (e) Confinement of the child to a locked room without monitoring by staff; (f) Failure to provide ongoing security for all prescription and nonprescription medication; (g) Isolation of a child for a period of time when there is substantial risk that the isolation, if continued, will impair or retard the mental health or physical well-being of the child. (31) "Permanent custody" means a legal status that vests in a public children services agency or a private child placing agency, all parental rights, duties, and obligations, including the right to consent to adoption, and divests the natural parents or adoptive parents of all parental rights, privileges, and obligations, including all residual rights and obligations. (32) "Permanent surrender" means the act of the parents or, if a child has only one parent, of the parent of a child, by a voluntary agreement authorized by section 5103.15 of the Revised Code, to transfer the permanent custody of the child to a public children services agency or a private child placing agency. (33) "Person" means an individual, association, corporation, or partnership and the state or any of its political subdivisions, departments, or agencies. (34) "Person responsible for a child's care in out-of-home care" means any of the following: (a) Any foster caregiver, in-home aide, or provider; (b) Any administrator, employee, or agent of any of the following: a public or private detention facility; shelter facility; certified children's crisis care facility; organization; certified organization; child care center; type A family child care home; licensed type B family child care home; group home; institution; state institution; residential facility; residential care facility; residential camp; day camp; school district; community school; chartered nonpublic school; educational service center; hospital; or medical clinic; (c) Any person who supervises or coaches children as part of an extracurricular activity sponsored by a school district, public school, or chartered nonpublic school; (d) Any other person who performs a similar function with respect to, or has a similar relationship to, children. (35) "Physical impairment" means having one or more of the following conditions that substantially limit one or more of an individual's major life activities, including self-care, receptive and expressive language, learning, mobility, and self-direction: (a) A substantial impairment of vision, speech, or hearing; (b) A congenital orthopedic impairment; (c) An orthopedic impairment caused by disease, rheumatic fever or any other similar chronic or acute health problem, or amputation or another similar cause. (36) "Placement for adoption" means the arrangement by a public children services agency or a private child placing agency with a person for the care and adoption by that person of a child of whom the agency has permanent custody. (37) "Placement in foster care" means the arrangement by a public children services agency or a private child placing agency for the out-of-home care of a child of whom the agency has temporary custody or permanent custody. (38) "Planned permanent living arrangement" means an order of a juvenile court pursuant to which both of the following apply: (a) The court gives legal custody of a child to a public children services agency or a private child placing agency without the termination of parental rights. (b) The order permits the agency to make an appropriate placement of the child and to enter into a written agreement with a foster care provider or with another person or agency with whom the child is placed. (39) "Practice of social work" and "practice of professional counseling" have the same meanings as in section 4757.01 of the Revised Code. (40) "Private, nonprofit therapeutic wilderness camp" has the same meaning as in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code. (41) "Sanction, service, or condition" means a sanction, service, or condition created by court order following an adjudication that a child is an unruly child that is described in division (A)(4) of section 2152.19 of the Revised Code. (42) "Protective supervision" means an order of disposition pursuant to which the court permits an abused, neglected, dependent, or unruly child to remain in the custody of the child's parents, guardian, or custodian and stay in the child's home, subject to any conditions and limitations upon the child, the child's parents, guardian, or custodian, or any other person that the court prescribes, including supervision as directed by the court for the protection of the child. (43) "Psychiatrist" has the same meaning as in section 5122.01 of the Revised Code. (44) "Psychologist" has the same meaning as in section 4732.01 of the Revised Code. (45) "Resource caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code. (46) "Resource family" has the same meaning as in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code. (47) "Residential camp" means a program in which the care, physical custody, or control of children is accepted overnight for recreational or recreational and educational purposes. (48) "Residential care facility" means an institution, residence, or facility that is licensed by the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health under section 5119.34 of the Revised Code and that provides care for a child. (49) "Residential facility" means a home or facility that is licensed by the department of developmental disabilities under section 5123.19 of the Revised Code and in which a child with a developmental disability resides. (50) "Residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities" means those rights, privileges, and responsibilities remaining with the natural parent after the transfer of legal custody of the child, including, but not necessarily limited to, the privilege of reasonable visitation, consent to adoption, the privilege to determine the child's religious affiliation, and the responsibility for support. (51) "School day" means the school day established by the board of education of the applicable school district pursuant to section 3313.481 of the Revised Code. (52) "School year" has the same meaning as in section 3313.62 of the Revised Code. (53) "Secure correctional facility" means a facility under the direction of the department of youth services that is designed to physically restrict the movement and activities of children and used for the placement of children after adjudication and disposition. (54) "Sexual activity" has the same meaning as in section 2907.01 of the Revised Code. (55) "Shelter" means the temporary care of children in physically unrestricted facilities pending court adjudication or disposition. (56) "Shelter for victims of domestic violence" has the same meaning as in section 3113.33 of the Revised Code. (57) "Sibling" means a biological sibling, a stepsibling or former stepsibling, or an adoptive sibling. (58) "Temporary custody" means legal custody of a child who is removed from the child's home, which custody may be terminated at any time at the discretion of the court or, if the legal custody is granted in an agreement for temporary custody, by the person who executed the agreement. (58)(59) "Traditional response" means a public children services agency's response to a report of child abuse or neglect that encourages engagement of the family in a comprehensive evaluation of the child's current and future safety needs and a fact-finding process to determine whether child abuse or neglect occurred and the circumstances surrounding the alleged harm or risk of harm. (C) For the purposes of this chapter, a child shall be presumed abandoned when the parents of the child have failed to visit or maintain contact with the child for more than ninety days, regardless of whether the parents resume contact with the child after that period of ninety days. Sec. 2151.317. (A) As used in this section, "hospital" has the same meaning as in section 5119.01 of the Revised Code. (B) Sibling youth in foster care, except youth in the custody of the department of youth services or admitted to a hospital, have the following rights, unless the exercise of the right is not in the best interests of each sibling, regardless of whether the parental rights of one or more of the foster youth's parents have been terminated: (1) To be placed in a foster home with the youth's siblings when it is in the best interests of each sibling and when the public children services agency locates an appropriate, capable, willing, and available joint placement for the siblings, in accordance with section 2151.411 of the Revised Code, to sustain family relationships; (2) To be placed in close geographical proximity to the youth's siblings to promote continuity in the siblings' relationship; (3) To obtain temporary respite placements together, when possible; (4) To be placed with foster parents or prospective adoptive parents and assigned to caseworkers who have been provided with training on the importance of sibling relationships; (5) To be promptly notified about changes in sibling placement, catastrophic events, or other circumstances involving the youth's siblings, including new placements, significant life events, and discharge from foster care; (6) To be included in permanency planning discussions or meetings regarding the youth's siblings, if appropriate; (7) To maintain frequent and meaningful contact with the youth's siblings in accordance with section 2151.411 of the Revised Code, if placement together is not possible; (8) To be actively involved in each other's lives and share celebrations, if the siblings choose to do so, including birthdays, graduations, holidays, school and extracurricular activities, cultural customs in the siblings' native language, and other milestones; (9) To annually receive contact information for all siblings in foster care, which may include a telephone number, address, social media accounts, and electronic mail address, unless a foster parent has requested the foster parent's identifiable information not be disclosed, and to receive updated photos of siblings regularly by mail or electronic mail, as appropriate; (10) To have more private and less restrictive communication with siblings as compared to communication with others who are not siblings; (11) To be provided with an explanation if contact with a sibling is restricted or denied; (12) To expect that the youth's guardian ad litem will advocate on the youth's behalf for frequent family time with siblings, unless the guardian ad litem determines through independent investigation that frequent family time is not in the youth's best interests; (13) To have family time with siblings encouraged in any adoptive or guardianship placement; (14) To be notified of the youth's rights regarding siblings by receiving an age-appropriate and developmentally appropriate document prepared by the department of children and youth as follows: (a) Within thirty days of the date of any placement or change in placement; (b) On each occasion that a youth's case plan is modified; (c) At each placement where the youth resides; (d) On at least an annual basis. (C) Adult siblings of youth in foster care have the right to be considered as resource caregivers, adoptive parents, and relative custodians for their siblings, if they choose to do so. (D) If the rights established under this section conflict with the rights of a resource family or resource caregiver, as established in section 5103.163 of the Revised Code, the rights established under this section preempt the rights of the resource family or resource caregiver. (E) The rights established under this section do not create grounds for a civil action against the department, a public children services agency, a resource caregiver, or a resource family. Sec. 2151.411. (A) Whenever a child comes into the custody of a public children services agency, either as part of a sibling group or subsequent to the previous placement of a sibling, the agency is strongly encouraged to make reasonable efforts to place the siblings together, unless it would be contrary to the siblings' best interest or well-being. If (B) If siblings are not placed together, the agency should make reasonable efforts to ensure the siblings maintain frequent connections through visitation or other ongoing interaction, unless contrary to the siblings' placement or well-being. as follows: (1) After asking the youth about the youth's wishes regarding sibling contact, the agency shall include information regarding sibling contact in a family time plan for the youth. (2) If it is in each sibling's best interest, the family time plan shall do all of the following: (a) Promote frequent contact between siblings in foster care, which may include telephone calls, text messages, social media, video calls, and in-person family time; (b) Clarify that sibling contact should not be limited in time or duration to periods of parental contact; (c) Clarify that restriction of sibling family time should not be a consequence for behavioral problems. Family time should be restricted only if it is in the best interests of the youth, sibling, or both. (d) Ensure timing and regularly scheduled sibling family time are outlined in case plans based on individual circumstances and needs of the youth. (3) If a youth in foster care requests an opportunity for family time with a sibling, the agency that has legal custody of the youth shall arrange the family time within a reasonable amount of time and document the family time. (4) If a youth in foster care requests an opportunity for family time with a sibling on a regular basis, the agency that has legal custody of the youth shall arrange the family time and ensure that the family time occurs with sufficient frequency and duration to promote continuity in the siblings' relationship. (5) If, in arranging sibling family time pursuant to this section, the agency determines that requested family time between the siblings would not be in the best interests of one or both of the siblings, the agency shall deny the request, document its reasons for making that determination, and provide the siblings with an explanation for the denial. In determining whether requested family time would be in the best interests of one or both of the siblings, the agency shall determine whether there is pending in any jurisdiction a criminal action in which either of the siblings is either a victim or a witness. If such a criminal action is pending, the agency, before arranging any family time between the siblings, shall consult with the district attorney for the jurisdiction in which the criminal action is pending to determine whether the requested family time may have a detrimental effect upon the prosecution of the pending criminal action. (C) Nothing in this section requires or permits a public children services agency to arrange sibling family time if the sibling family time would violate an existing protection order in any case pending in this state or any other state. (D) The director of children and youth shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement this section. Sec. 2151.412. (A) Each public children services agency and private child placing agency shall prepare and maintain a case plan for any child to whom the agency is providing services and to whom any of the following applies: (1) The agency filed a complaint pursuant to section 2151.27 of the Revised Code alleging that the child is an abused, neglected, or dependent child; (2) The agency has temporary or permanent custody of the child; (3) The child is living at home subject to an order for protective supervision; (4) The child is in a planned permanent living arrangement. Except as provided by division (A)(2) of section 5103.153 of the Revised Code, a private child placing agency providing services to a child who is the subject of a voluntary permanent custody surrender agreement entered into under division (B)(4) of section 5103.15 of the Revised Code is not required to prepare and maintain a case plan for that child. (B) Each public children services agency shall prepare and maintain a case plan for any child for whom the agency is providing in-home services pursuant to an alternative response. (C)(1) The director of children and youth shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code setting forth the content and format of case plans required by division (A) of this section and establishing procedures for developing, implementing, and changing the case plans. The rules shall at a minimum comply with the requirements of Title IV-E of the "Social Security Act," 42 U.S.C. 670, et seq. (1980). (2) The director of children and youth shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code requiring public children services agencies and private child placing agencies to maintain case plans for children and their families who are receiving services in their homes from the agencies and for whom case plans are not required by division (A) of this section. The rules for public children services agencies shall include the requirements for case plans maintained for children and their families who are receiving services in their homes from public children services agencies pursuant to an alternative response. The agencies shall maintain case plans as required by those rules; however, the case plans shall not be subject to any other provision of this section except as specifically required by the rules. (D) Each public children services agency and private child placing agency that is required by division (A) of this section to maintain a case plan shall file the case plan with the court prior to the child's adjudicatory hearing but no later than thirty days after the earlier of the date on which the complaint in the case was filed or the child was first placed into shelter care. If the agency does not have sufficient information prior to the adjudicatory hearing to complete any part of the case plan, the agency shall specify in the case plan the additional information necessary to complete each part of the case plan and the steps that will be taken to obtain that information. All parts of the case plan shall be completed by the earlier of thirty days after the adjudicatory hearing or the date of the dispositional hearing for the child. (E) Any agency that is required by division (A) of this section to prepare a case plan shall attempt to obtain an agreement among all parties, including, but not limited to, the parents, guardian, or custodian of the child and the guardian ad litem of the child regarding the content of the case plan. If all parties agree to the content of the case plan and the court approves it, the court shall journalize it as part of its dispositional order. If the agency cannot obtain an agreement upon the contents of the case plan or the court does not approve it, the parties shall present evidence on the contents of the case plan at the dispositional hearing. The court, based upon the evidence presented at the dispositional hearing and the best interest of the child, shall determine the contents of the case plan and journalize it as part of the dispositional order for the child. (F)(1) All parties, including the parents, guardian, or custodian of the child, are bound by the terms of the journalized case plan. A party that fails to comply with the terms of the journalized case plan may be held in contempt of court. (2) Any party may propose a change to a substantive part of the case plan, including, but not limited to, the child's placement and the visitation rights of any party. A party proposing a change to the case plan shall file the proposed change with the court and give notice of the proposed change in writing before the end of the day after the day of filing it to all parties and the child's guardian ad litem. All parties and the guardian ad litem shall have seven days from the date the notice is sent to object to and request a hearing on the proposed change. (a) If it receives a timely request for a hearing, the court shall schedule a hearing pursuant to section 2151.417 of the Revised Code to be held no later than thirty days after the request is received by the court. The court shall give notice of the date, time, and location of the hearing to all parties and the guardian ad litem. The agency may implement the proposed change after the hearing, if the court approves it. The agency shall not implement the proposed change unless it is approved by the court. (b) If it does not receive a timely request for a hearing, the court may approve the proposed change without a hearing. If the court approves the proposed change without a hearing, it shall journalize the case plan with the change not later than fourteen days after the change is filed with the court. If the court does not approve the proposed change to the case plan, it shall schedule a hearing to be held pursuant to section 2151.417 of the Revised Code no later than thirty days after the expiration of the fourteen-day time period and give notice of the date, time, and location of the hearing to all parties and the guardian ad litem of the child. If, despite the requirements of division (F)(2) of this section, the court neither approves and journalizes the proposed change nor conducts a hearing, the agency may implement the proposed change not earlier than fifteen days after it is submitted to the court. (3) If an agency has reasonable cause to believe that a child is suffering from illness or injury and is not receiving proper care and that an appropriate change in the child's case plan is necessary to prevent immediate or threatened physical or emotional harm, to believe that a child is in immediate danger from the child's surroundings and that an immediate change in the child's case plan is necessary to prevent immediate or threatened physical or emotional harm to the child, or to believe that a parent, guardian, custodian, or other member of the child's household has abused or neglected the child and that the child is in danger of immediate or threatened physical or emotional harm from that person unless the agency makes an appropriate change in the child's case plan, it may implement the change without prior agreement or a court hearing and, before the end of the next day after the change is made, give all parties, the guardian ad litem of the child, and the court notice of the change. Before the end of the third day after implementing the change in the case plan, the agency shall file a statement of the change with the court and give notice of the filing accompanied by a copy of the statement to all parties and the guardian ad litem. All parties and the guardian ad litem shall have ten days from the date the notice is sent to object to and request a hearing on the change. (a) If it receives a timely request for a hearing, the court shall schedule a hearing pursuant to section 2151.417 of the Revised Code to be held no later than thirty days after the request is received by the court. The court shall give notice of the date, time, and location of the hearing to all parties and the guardian ad litem. The agency shall continue to administer the case plan with the change after the hearing, if the court approves the change. If the court does not approve the change, the court shall make appropriate changes to the case plan and shall journalize the case plan. (b) If it does not receive a timely request for a hearing, the court may approve the change without a hearing. If the court approves the change without a hearing, it shall journalize the case plan with the change within fourteen days after receipt of the change. If the court does not approve the change to the case plan, it shall schedule a hearing under section 2151.417 of the Revised Code to be held no later than thirty days after the expiration of the fourteen-day time period and give notice of the date, time, and location of the hearing to all parties and the guardian ad litem of the child. (4)(a) Except as provided in division (F)(4)(b) of this section, the court shall not approve a change to the child's placement and may presume that continuation of the child's current placement is in the child's best interests if all of the following apply: (i) The child's current placement has been in a stable home environment for the past nine months. (ii) A change in the child's placement would be detrimental to the child's emotional well-being. (iii) The child's foster caregiver has not requested, in writing, that the placement be changed. (b) The court may approve a change to the child's placement if it is in the child's best interests and the child's foster caregiver requests, in writing, the change in the child's placement. (G)(1) All case plans for children in temporary custody shall have the following general goals: (a) Consistent with the best interest and special needs of the child, to achieve a safe out-of-home placement in the least restrictive, most family-like setting available and in close proximity to the home from which the child was removed or the home in which the child will be permanently placed; (b) To eliminate with all due speed the need for the out-of-home placement so that the child can safely return home. (2) The director of children and youth shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code setting forth the general goals of case plans for children subject to dispositional orders for protective supervision, a planned permanent living arrangement, or permanent custody. (H) In the agency's development of a case plan and the court's review of the case plan, the child's health and safety shall be the paramount concern. The agency and the court shall be guided by the following general priorities: (1) A child who is residing with or can be placed with the child's parents within a reasonable time should remain in their legal custody even if an order of protective supervision is required for a reasonable period of time; (2) If both parents of the child have abandoned the child, have relinquished custody of the child, have become incapable of supporting or caring for the child even with reasonable assistance, or have a detrimental effect on the health, safety, and best interest of the child, the child should be placed in the legal custody of a suitable member of the child's extended family; (3) If a child described in division (H)(2) of this section has no suitable member of the child's extended family to accept legal custody, the child should be placed in the legal custody of a suitable nonrelative who shall be made a party to the proceedings after being given legal custody of the child; (4) If the child has no suitable member of the child's extended family to accept legal custody of the child and no suitable nonrelative is available to accept legal custody of the child and, if the child temporarily cannot or should not be placed with the child's parents, guardian, or custodian, the child should be placed in the temporary custody of a public children services agency or a private child placing agency; (5) If the child cannot be placed with either of the child's parents within a reasonable period of time or should not be placed with either, if no suitable member of the child's extended family or suitable nonrelative is available to accept legal custody of the child, and if the agency has a reasonable expectation of placing the child for adoption, the child should be committed to the permanent custody of the public children services agency or private child placing agency; (6) If the child is to be placed for adoption or foster care, the placement shall not be delayed or denied on the basis of the child's or adoptive or foster family's race, color, or national origin. (I) The case plan for a child in temporary custody shall include at a minimum the following requirements if the child is or has been the victim of abuse or neglect or if the child witnessed the commission in the child's household of abuse or neglect against a sibling of the child, a parent of the child, or any other person in the child's household: (1) A requirement that the child's parents, guardian, or custodian participate in mandatory counseling; (2) A requirement that the child's parents, guardian, or custodian participate in any supportive services that are required by or provided pursuant to the child's case plan. (J)(1) Prior to January 1, 2023, a case plan for a child in temporary custody may include, as a supplement, a plan for locating a permanent family placement. The supplement shall not be considered part of the case plan for purposes of division (E) of this section. (2) On and after January 1, 2023, a case plan for a child in temporary custody shall include a permanency plan for the child unless it is documented that such a plan would not be in the best interest of the child. The permanency plan shall describe the services the agency shall provide to achieve permanency for the child if reasonable efforts to return the child to the child's home, or eliminate the continued removal from that home, are unsuccessful. Those services shall be provided concurrently with reasonable efforts to return the child home or eliminate the child's continued removal from home. (3) The director of children and youth, pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt rules necessary to carry out the purposes of division (J) of this section. (K)(1) A public children services agency may request that the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation conduct a criminal records check with respect to a parent, guardian, custodian, prospective custodian, or prospective placement whose actions result in a finding after the filing of a complaint as described in division (A)(1) of this section that a child is an abused, neglected, or dependent child. The public children services agency shall request that the superintendent obtain information from the federal bureau of investigation as part of the criminal records check. (2) At any time on or after the date that is ninety days after September 10, 2012, a prosecuting attorney, or an assistant prosecuting attorney appointed under section 309.06 of the Revised Code, may request that the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation conduct a criminal records check with respect to each parent, guardian, custodian, prospective custodian, or prospective placement whose actions resulted in a finding after the filing of a complaint described in division (A)(1) of this section that a child is an abused, neglected, or dependent child. Each prosecuting attorney or assistant prosecuting attorney who makes such a request shall request that the superintendent obtain information from the federal bureau of investigation as part of the criminal records check for each parent, guardian, custodian, prospective custodian, or prospective placement who is a subject of the request. (3) A public children services agency, prosecuting attorney, or assistant prosecuting attorney that requests a criminal records check under division (K)(1) or (2) of this section shall do both of the following: (a) Provide to each parent, guardian, custodian, prospective custodian, or prospective placement for whom a criminal records check is requested a copy of the form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code and a standard fingerprint impression sheet prescribed pursuant to division (C)(2) of that section and obtain the completed form and impression sheet from the parent, guardian, custodian, prospective custodian, or prospective placement; (b) Forward the completed form and impression sheet to the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation. (4) A parent, guardian, custodian, prospective custodian, or prospective placement who is given a form and fingerprint impression sheet under division (K)(3)(a) of this section and who fails to complete the form or provide fingerprint impressions may be held in contempt of court. Sec. 2151.416. (A) Each agency that is required by section 2151.412 of the Revised Code to prepare a case plan for a child shall complete a semiannual administrative review of the case plan no later than six months after the earlier of the date on which the complaint in the case was filed or the child was first placed in shelter care. After the first administrative review, the agency shall complete semiannual administrative reviews no later than every six months. If the court issues an order pursuant to section 2151.414 or 2151.415 of the Revised Code, the agency shall complete an administrative review no later than six months after the court's order and continue to complete administrative reviews no later than every six months after the first review, except that the court hearing held pursuant to section 2151.417 of the Revised Code may take the place of any administrative review that would otherwise be held at the time of the court hearing. When conducting a review, the child's health and safety shall be the paramount concern. (B) Each administrative review required by division (A) of this section shall be conducted by a review panel of at least three persons, including, but not limited to, both of the following: (1) A caseworker with day-to-day responsibility for, or familiarity with, the management of the child's case plan; (2) A person who is not responsible for the management of the child's case plan or for the delivery of services to the child or the parents, guardian, or custodian of the child. (C) Each semiannual administrative review shall include, but not be limited to, a joint meeting by the review panel with the parents, guardian, or custodian of the child, the guardian ad litem of the child, and the child's foster care provider and shall include an opportunity for those persons to submit any written materials to be included in the case record of the child. If a parent, guardian, custodian, guardian ad litem, or foster care provider of the child cannot be located after reasonable efforts to do so or declines to participate in the administrative review after being contacted, the agency does not have to include them in the joint meeting. (D) The agency shall prepare a written summary of the semiannual administrative review that shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following: (1) A conclusion regarding the safety and appropriateness of the child's foster care placement; (2) The extent of the compliance with the case plan of all parties; (3) The extent of progress that has been made toward alleviating the circumstances that required the agency to assume temporary custody of the child; (4) An estimated date by which the child may be returned to and safely maintained in the child's home or placed for adoption or legal custody; (5) An updated case plan that includes any changes that the agency is proposing in the case plan; (6) The recommendation of the agency as to which agency or person should be given custodial rights over the child for the six-month period after the administrative review; (7) The names of all persons who participated in the administrative review; (8) A summary of the agency's intensive efforts to secure a placement with diligent search for an appropriate and willing kinship caregiver as defined in section 5180.50 of the Revised Codeadult relative or adult nonrelative with a significant relationship to the child, including any use of search technology to find biological family members of the child and all other efforts undertaken since the last review, unless a court has determined that intensive efforts are unnecessary the search is no longer required pursuant to section 2151.4118 2151.4117 of the Revised Code or the agency is not required to consider an adult relative or adult nonrelative with a significant relationship to the child for placement pursuant to section 2151.4120 of the Revised Code; (9) For a child who has one or more siblings who have not been placed together, a determination of whether the need or reasoning that led to the siblings not being placed together is still a current need or concern and whether the siblings may be placed together. (E) The agency shall file the summary with the court no later than seven days after the completion of the administrative review. If the agency proposes a change to the case plan as a result of the administrative review, the agency shall file the proposed change with the court at the time it files the summary. The agency shall give notice of the summary and proposed change in writing before the end of the next day after filing them to all parties and the child's guardian ad litem. All parties and the guardian ad litem shall have seven days after the date the notice is sent to object to and request a hearing on the proposed change. (1) If the court receives a timely request for a hearing, the court shall schedule a hearing pursuant to section 2151.417 of the Revised Code to be held not later than thirty days after the court receives the request. The court shall give notice of the date, time, and location of the hearing to all parties and the guardian ad litem. The agency may implement the proposed change after the hearing, if the court approves it. The agency shall not implement the proposed change unless it is approved by the court. (2) If the court does not receive a timely request for a hearing, the court may approve the proposed change without a hearing. If the court approves the proposed change without a hearing, it shall journalize the case plan with the change not later than fourteen days after the change is filed with the court. If the court does not approve the proposed change to the case plan, it shall schedule a review hearing to be held pursuant to section 2151.417 of the Revised Code no later than thirty days after the expiration of the fourteen-day time period and give notice of the date, time, and location of the hearing to all parties and the guardian ad litem of the child. If, despite the requirements of this division and division (D) of section 2151.417 of the Revised Code, the court neither approves and journalizes the proposed change nor conducts a hearing, the agency may implement the proposed change not earlier than fifteen days after it is submitted to the court. (F) The director of children and youth may adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for procedures and standard forms for conducting administrative reviews pursuant to this section. (G) The juvenile court that receives the written summary of the administrative review, upon determining, either from the written summary, case plan, or otherwise, that the custody or care arrangement is not in the best interest of the child, may terminate the custody of an agency and place the child in the custody of another institution or association certified by the department of children and youth under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2151.417. (A) Any court that issues a dispositional order pursuant to section 2151.353, 2151.414, or 2151.415 of the Revised Code may review at any time the child's placement or custody arrangement, the case plan prepared for the child pursuant to section 2151.412 of the Revised Code, the actions of the public children services agency or private child placing agency in implementing that case plan, the child's permanency plan if the child's permanency plan has been approved, and any other aspects of the child's placement or custody arrangement. In conducting the review, the court shall determine the appropriateness of any agency actions, the safety and appropriateness of continuing the child's placement or custody arrangement, and whether any changes should be made with respect to the child's permanency plan or placement or custody arrangement or with respect to the actions of the agency under the child's placement or custody arrangement. Based upon the evidence presented at a hearing held after notice to all parties and the guardian ad litem of the child, the court may require the agency, the parents, guardian, or custodian of the child, and the physical custodians of the child to take any reasonable action that the court determines is necessary and in the best interest of the child or to discontinue any action that it determines is not in the best interest of the child. (B) If a court issues a dispositional order pursuant to section 2151.353, 2151.414, or 2151.415 of the Revised Code, the court has continuing jurisdiction over the child as set forth in division (F)(1) of section 2151.353 of the Revised Code. The court may amend a dispositional order in accordance with division (F)(2) of section 2151.353 of the Revised Code at any time upon its own motion or upon the motion of any interested party. The court shall comply with section 2151.42 of the Revised Code in amending any dispositional order pursuant to this division. (C)(1) Any court that issues a dispositional order pursuant to section 2151.353, 2151.414, or 2151.415 of the Revised Code shall hold a review hearing one year after the earlier of the date on which the complaint in the case was filed or the child was first placed into shelter care to review the case plan prepared pursuant to section 2151.412 of the Revised Code and the child's placement or custody arrangement, to approve or review the permanency plan for the child, and to make changes to the case plan and placement or custody arrangement consistent with the permanency plan. The court shall schedule the review hearing at the time that it holds the dispositional hearing pursuant to section 2151.35 of the Revised Code. (2) The court shall hold a similar review hearing no later than every twelve months after the initial review hearing until the child is adopted, returned to the parents, or the court otherwise terminates the child's placement or custody arrangement, except that the dispositional hearing held pursuant to section 2151.415 of the Revised Code shall take the place of the first review hearing to be held under this section. The court shall schedule each subsequent review hearing at the conclusion of the review hearing immediately preceding the review hearing to be scheduled. (3) The court is not required to continue holding review hearings under divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section regarding a child subject to an order of legal custody under section 2151.353 or 2151.415 of the Revised Code, if all of the following apply: (a) The child is not subject to an order of protective supervision under section 2151.353 or 2151.415 of the Revised Code. (b) A public children services agency or private child placing agency is not providing services to the child. (c) The court finds that further review under divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section are no longer necessary to serve the child's best interests. (D) If, within fourteen days after a written summary of an administrative review is filed with the court pursuant to section 2151.416 of the Revised Code, the court does not approve the proposed change to the case plan filed pursuant to division (E) of section 2151.416 of the Revised Code or a party or the guardian ad litem requests a review hearing pursuant to division (E) of that section, the court shall hold a review hearing in the same manner that it holds review hearings pursuant to division (C) of this section, except that if a review hearing is required by this division and if a hearing is to be held pursuant to division (C) of this section or section 2151.415 of the Revised Code, the hearing held pursuant to division (C) of this section or section 2151.415 of the Revised Code shall take the place of the review hearing required by this division. (E) If a court determines pursuant to section 2151.419 of the Revised Code that a public children services agency or private child placing agency is not required to make reasonable efforts to prevent the removal of a child from the child's home, eliminate the continued removal of a child from the child's home, and return the child to the child's home, and the court does not return the child to the child's home pursuant to division (A)(3) of section 2151.419 of the Revised Code, the court shall hold a review hearing to approve the permanency plan for the child and, if appropriate, to make changes to the child's case plan and the child's placement or custody arrangement consistent with the permanency plan. The court may hold the hearing immediately following the determination under section 2151.419 of the Revised Code and shall hold it no later than thirty days after making that determination. (F) The court shall give notice of the review hearings held pursuant to this section to every interested party, including, but not limited to, the appropriate agency employees who are responsible for the child's care and planning, the child's parents, any person who had guardianship or legal custody of the child prior to the custody order, the child's guardian ad litem, and the child. The court shall summon every interested party to appear at the review hearing and give them an opportunity to testify and to present other evidence with respect to the child's custody arrangement, including, but not limited to, the following: the case plan for the child; the permanency plan, if one exists; the actions taken by the child's custodian; the need for a change in the child's custodian or caseworker; and the need for any specific action to be taken with respect to the child. The court shall require any interested party to testify or present other evidence when necessary to a proper determination of the issues presented at the review hearing. In any review hearing that pertains to a permanency plan for a child who will not be returned to the parent, the court shall consider in-state and out-of-state placement options and the court shall determine whether the in-state or the out-of-state placement continues to be appropriate and in the best interests of the child. In any review hearing that pertains to a permanency plan for a child, the court or a citizens board appointed by the court pursuant to division (H) of this section shall consult with the child, in an age-appropriate manner, regarding the proposed permanency plan for the child. (G) After the review hearing, the court shall take the following actions based upon the evidence presented: (1) If an administrative review has been conducted, determine whether the conclusions of the review are supported by a preponderance of the evidence and approve or modify the case plan based upon that evidence; (2) If the hearing was held under division (C) or (E) of this section, approve a permanency plan for the child that specifies whether and, if applicable, when the child will be safely returned home or placed for adoption, for legal custody, or in a planned permanent living arrangement. A permanency plan approved after a hearing under division (E) of this section shall not include any provision requiring the child to be returned to the child's home. (3) If the child is in temporary custody, do all of the following: (a) Determine whether the child can and should be returned home with or without an order for protective supervision; (b) If the child can and should be returned home with or without an order for protective supervision, terminate the order for temporary custody; (c) If the child cannot or should not be returned home with an order for protective supervision, determine whether the agency currently with custody of the child should retain custody or whether another public children services agency, private child placing agency, or an individual should be given custody of the child. The court shall comply with section 2151.42 of the Revised Code in taking any action under this division. (4) If the child is in permanent custody, determine what actions are required by the custodial agency and of any other organizations or persons in order to facilitate an adoption of the child and make any appropriate orders with respect to the custody arrangement or conditions of the child, including, but not limited to, a transfer of permanent custody to another public children services agency or private child placing agency; (5) Journalize the terms of the updated case plan for the child. (H) The court may appoint a referee or a citizens review board to conduct the review hearings that the court is required by this section to conduct, subject to the review and approval by the court of any determinations made by the referee or citizens review board. If the court appoints a citizens review board to conduct the review hearings, the board shall consist of one member representing the general public and four members who are trained or experienced in the care or placement of children and have training or experience in the fields of medicine, psychology, social work, education, or any related field. Of the initial appointments to the board, two shall be for a term of one year, two shall be for a term of two years, and one shall be for a term of three years, with all the terms ending one year after the date on which the appointment was made. Thereafter, all terms of the board members shall be for three years and shall end on the same day of the same month of the year as did the term that they succeed. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which the member's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of the term. (I) A copy of the court's determination following any review hearing held pursuant to this section shall be sent to the custodial agency, the guardian ad litem of the child who is the subject of the review hearing, and, if that child is not the subject of a permanent commitment hearing, the parents of the child. (J) If the hearing held under this section takes the place of an administrative review that otherwise would have been held under section 2151.416 of the Revised Code, the court at the hearing held under this section shall do all of the following in addition to any other requirements of this section: (1) Determine the continued necessity for and the safety and appropriateness of the child's placement; (2) Determine the extent of compliance with the child's case plan; (3) Determine the extent of progress that has been made toward alleviating or mitigating the causes necessitating the child's placement in foster care; (4) Project a likely date by which the child may be safely returned home or placed for adoption or legal custody. (K)(1) Whenever the court is required to approve a permanency plan under this section or section 2151.415 of the Revised Code, the public children services agency or private child placing agency that filed the complaint in the case, has custody of the child, or will be given custody of the child shall develop a permanency plan for the child. The agency must file the plan with the court prior to the hearing under this section or section 2151.415 of the Revised Code. (2) The permanency plan developed by the agency must specify whether and, if applicable, when the child will be safely returned home or placed for adoption or legal custody. If the agency determines that there is a compelling reason why returning the child home or placing the child for adoption or legal custody is not in the best interest of the child, the plan shall provide that the child will be placed in a planned permanent living arrangement. A permanency plan developed as a result of a determination made under division (A)(2) of section 2151.419 of the Revised Code may not include any provision requiring the child to be returned home. (3)(a) Whenever a court is required under this section or section 2151.415 or 2151.419 of the Revised Code to conduct a review hearing to approve a permanency plan, the court shall determine whether the agency required to develop the plan has made reasonable efforts to finalize it. In determining whether the agency made reasonable efforts to finalize the permanency plan, the court shall consider whether the agency complied with sections 2151.4115 to 2151.4120 of the Revised Code. If the court determines the agency has not made reasonable efforts to finalize the plan, the court shall issue an order finalizing a permanency plan requiring the agency to use reasonable efforts to do the following: (i) Place the child in a timely manner into a permanent placement; (ii) Complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child. (b) In making reasonable efforts as required in division (K)(3)(a) of this section, the agency shall consider the child's health and safety as the paramount concern. Sec. 2151.4115. A public children services agency or private child placing agency shall, on removal of a child from the child's home, initiate a diligent search in accordance with section 2151.4116 of the Revised Code for the child's adult relatives and adult nonrelatives with a significant relationship to the child to assume temporary or legal custody of the child or otherwise provide the child a home. Sec. 2151.4116. The diligent search required under section 2151.4115 of the Revised Code shall include all of the following: (A) Interviews, to be conducted as necessary throughout the pendency of proceedings regarding the case, with the following: (1) The child; (2) The child's parents; (3) Identified adult relatives; (4) Any other person who is likely to have information about the identity or location of the person being sought. (B) Comprehensive searches of databases available to the agency, including searches of employment, residence, utilities, vehicle registration, child support enforcement, law enforcement, corrections records, and any other records likely to result in identifying and locating the person being sought; (C) Appropriate inquiry made during any hearings in the case; (D) Any other reasonable means that are likely to identify adult relatives or adult nonrelatives with a significant relationship to the child. Sec. 2151.4117. The public children services agency or private child placing agency shall continue to search for adult relatives or adult nonrelatives with a significant relationship to the child in accordance with section 2151.4115 of the Revised Code until one of the following occurs: (A) An adult relative or adult nonrelative with a significant relationship to the child with whom to place the child is found. (B) A permanency plan is approved for the child. (C) The court orders the agency to discontinue the search. Sec. 2151.4118. The diligent search and notification required under sections 2151.4115 and 2151.4119 of the Revised Code shall be completed, documented in writing, and filed with the court not later than thirty days after the removal of the child from the child's home, or as otherwise required by the court, and at each review hearing under section 2151.417 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2151.4119. The public children services agency or private child placing agency shall provide notice to all of the child's adult relatives and adult nonrelatives with a significant relationship to the child identified by the search under section 2151.4115 of the Revised Code, unless the agency determines that the adult identified may cause or has caused the child to be an abused, neglected, or dependent child. The notice shall include all of the following: (A) Notification that the child has been or is being removed from the child's home; (B) An explanation of the options the identified relative or nonrelative has to participate in the care and placement of the child and any options that may be lost by failing to respond to the notice; (C) A description of the process for becoming an approved foster home under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code and the additional services and supports available for children placed in approved foster homes; (D) A description of any financial assistance for which the identified relative or nonrelative may be eligible. Sec. 2151.4120. A court may excuse a public children services agency or private child placing agency from considering an adult relative or adult nonrelative with a significant relationship to the child for placement if the adult relative or adult nonrelative entitled to notice under section 2151.4119 of the Revised Code fails, within six months of receipt of the notice, to demonstrate an interest in and willingness to assume temporary or legal custody of the child or otherwise demonstrate an interest in providing the child a home. Sec. 2151.4122. Nothing in sections 2151.4115 to 2151.4121 2151.4120 of the Revised Code shall be construed to prevent a public children services agency or private child placing agency from continuing to search for or consider kinship caregivers. Sec. 2151.424. (A) If a child has been placed in a certified foster home or is in the custody of, or has been placed with, a kinship caregiver as defined in section 5180.50 of the Revised Code, a court, prior to conducting any hearing pursuant to division (F)(2) or (3) of section 2151.412 or section 2151.28, 2151.33, 2151.35, 2151.414, 2151.415, 2151.416, or 2151.417 of the Revised Code with respect to the child, shall notify, in writing, the foster caregiver or kinship caregiver of the date, time, and place of the hearing. At the hearing, the foster caregiver or kinship caregiver shall have the right to be heardparticipate. (B) If a public children services agency or private child placing agency has permanent custody of a child and a petition to adopt the child has been filed under Chapter 3107. of the Revised Code, the agency, prior to conducting a review under section 2151.416 of the Revised Code, or a court, prior to conducting a hearing under division (F)(2) or (3) of section 2151.412 or section 2151.416 or 2151.417 of the Revised Code, shall notify the prospective adoptive parent of the date, time, and place of the review or hearing. At the review or hearing, the prospective adoptive parent shall have the right to be heardparticipate. (C) The foster caregiver or kinship caregiver shall be encouraged to update the court about the child in the caregiver's care, express concerns to the court that relate to the child, ask questions about any aspect of the child's case, and file reports and letters with the court as part of the child's case record. (D) The notice and the opportunity to be heard participate do not make the foster caregiver, kinship caregiver, or prospective adoptive parent a party in the action or proceeding pursuant to which the review or hearing is conducted. Sec. 5103.161. As used in this section, "permanent custody" has the same meaning as in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code. If a private child placing agency or public children services agency has placed a child in a foster home or with a relative of the child, other than a parent of the child, the agency shall notify the child's foster caregiver or relative if the agency seeks permanent custody of the child, or, if the agency already has permanent custody of the child, seeks to place the child for adoption. The notice also shall inform the foster caregiver or relative that the foster caregiver or relative can be considered for adoption. If the foster caregiver or relative informs the agency that the foster caregiver or relative wants to adopt the child, the agency shall inform the foster caregiver or relative of the process for obtaining an application to adopt the child and that the child may be placed for adoption in another home even if the foster caregiver or relative submits the application. If the agency is given permanent custody of the child and the foster caregiver or relative has informed the agency of the foster caregiver's or relative's desire to adopt the child, the agency shall consider giving preference to an adult relative over a nonrelative caregiver when determining an adoptive placement for the child, provided the adult relative satisfies all relevant child protection standards and the agency determines that the placement is in the child's best interest. Section 2. That existing sections 2151.011, 2151.411, 2151.412, 2151.416, 2151.417, 2151.4122, 2151.424, and 5103.161 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. That sections 2151.4115, 2151.4116, 2151.4117, 2151.4118, 2151.4119, 2151.4120, and 2151.4121 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 4. This act shall be known as the Fostering Sibling Success Act.